Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-183
Sioux.

The county of Sioux is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township twenty-four, north, of range fifty-three, west, of the sixth principal meridian; thence west to the western boundary line of the State of Nebraska; thence north along the said boundary line to the northwest corner of the State of Nebraska; thence east on the northern boundary line of the State of Nebraska to the range line between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three; thence south to the place of beginning.

Laws 1885, c. 35, § 1, p. 209;

R.S.1913, § 898;

C.S.1922, § 800;

C.S.1929, § 25-187;

R.S.1943, § 22-183.